src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!! ----

!! Veps adjectives compare.

! LEXICON Comparisons
! +A+pos:0        Cases   ;
! +A+cmp:er       Cases   ;
! +A+sup:est      Cases   ;

! uz’:ud
LEXICON A_UZ !!= * @CODE@
: NMN_NORUZ ;

LEXICON A_RUSKED !!= * @CODE@
+A: NMN_RUSKED ;

LEXICON A_  !!= * @CODE@, just beginning 
 N_ ;

LEXICON A_MUNA !  muna:mun
 N_MUNA ;
+Cmp:e%>mb N_POIG ;

LEXICON A_NADO !  nado:nado
 N_NADO ;
+Cmp:%>mb N_POIG ;


LEXICON A_POIG ! poig:poig
 N_POIG ;
+Cmp:e%>mb N_POIG ;

LEXICON A_MARJ ! marj:marj
 N_MARJ ;
+Cmp:e%>mb N_POIG ;

LEXICON A_JAUH ! jauh:jauh
!(-on\,\ -oid\)
 N_JAUH ;
+Cmp:%>mb N_POIG ;

LEXICON A_OIGED !oiged:oig%{eØ%}d
!oi|ged (-ktan, -ktoid)
 N_OIGED ;
+Cmp:%^RmVow%^DEVOICE%>e%>mb N_POIG ;

LEXICON A_KEL !kel':kel
 N_KEL ;
+Cmp:%>e%>mb N_POIG ;
+Der+Der/Uz1+N:ud N_NORUZ ;

LEXICON A_SAR1 !sar':sar
 N_SAR1 ;
+Cmp:%>e%>mb N_POIG ;
+Der+Der/Uz1+N:ud N_NORUZ ;

LEXICON A_KEZI !kezi:ked
 N_KEZI ;
+Cmp:%>e%>mb N_POIG ;
+Der+Der/Uz1+N:ud N_NORUZ ;


LEXICON A_VIDENZ1 ! videnz':viden (-den, -t, -zid)
N_VIDENZ1 ;


LEXICON A_LANDEH ! landeh:land
 N_LANDEH ;
+Cmp:%>he%>mb N_POIG ;

LEXICON A_VEDEKAZ ! vedekaz:vedeka
 N_VEDEKAZ ;
+Cmp:ha%>mb N_POIG ;

LEXICON A_SEIBAZ ! seibaz:seib
 N_SEIBAZ ;
+Cmp:ha%>mb N_POIG ;

LEXICON A_CIPUINE !cipuine:cipu
 N_CIPUINE ;
+Cmp:iže%>mb N_POIG ;
+Der+Der/Uz1+N:ižud N_NORUZ ;

LEXICON A_TOSHTMINE ! toštmine:toštmi
 N_TOSHTMINE ;
+Cmp:že%>mb N_POIG ;

LEXICON A_KENGATOI ! kengätoi:kengäto
+Cmp:ma%>mb N_POIG ;
+Der+Der/Uz1+N:mud N_NORUZ ;
:i SG-NOM-SUF ;
:n SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:ma SG-OBLIQUE ;
! Plural
:ma PL-NOM-SUF ;
:ma PL-ACC-SUF ;
:m PL-OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON PRFPRC-DECLENSION ! -nu
+Cmp:%>mb N_POIG ;
 SG-NOM-SUF ;
: SG-PAR-SUF_t ;
:de SG-OBLIQUE ;
! Plural
:de PL-NOM-SUF ;
:de PL-ACC-SUF ;
:z  PL-OBLIQUE ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
